zh-CN: 跨国家/地区绑定系统: NNN; Pilot; Prolink; Rottefella Roller; SNS; Turnamic; 通用底座; 其他
tr: Kros kayağı bağlama sistemi: NNN; Pilot; Prolink; Rottefella Roller; SNS; Turnamic; Evrensel montaj; Diğer
pl: System wiązań do biegówek: NNN; Pilot; Prolink; Rottefella Roller; SNS; Turnamic; Mocowanie uniwersalne; Inne
hu: Sífutás kötésrendszere: NNN; Pilot; Prolink; Rottefella Roller; SNS; Turnamic; Univerzális rögzítés; Egyéb
th: ระบบผูกมัดข้ามประเทศ: NNN; Pilot; Prolink; Rottefella Roller; SNS; Turnamic; เมาท์อเนกประสงค์; อื่นๆ
ja: クロスカントリービンディングシステム: NNN; パイロット; プロリンク; ロッテフェラーローラー; SNS; ターナミック; ユニバーサルマウント; その他
pt-PT: Sistema de encadernação Cross-país: NNN; Pilot; Prolink; Rottefella Roller; SNS; Turnamic; Suporte universal; Outro
ro-RO: Sistem de legare cross-country: NNN; Pilot; Prolink; Rottefella Roller; SNS; Turnamic; Prindere universală; Altele
en: Cross-country binding system: NNN; Pilot; Prolink; Rottefella Roller; SNS; Turnamic; Universal mount; Other
ru: Система креплений для беговых лыж: NNN; Pilot; Prolink; Rottefella Roller; SNS; Turnamic; Универсальное крепление; Другое
de: Langlaufbindungssystem: NNN; Pilot; Prolink; Rottefella Roller; SNS; Turnamic; Universelle Halterung; Sonstige
cs: Systém vázání na běžky: NNN; Pilot; Prolink; Rottefella Roller; SNS; Turnamic; Univerzální držák; Ostatní
lt-LT: Slidinėjimo kroso tvirtinimo sistema: NNN; Pilot; Prolink; Rottefella Roller; SNS; Turnamic; Universalus laikiklis; Kita
hr-HR: Sustav vezanja kod kros trčanja: NNN; Pilot; Prolink; Rottefella Roller; SNS; Turnamic; Univerzalni nosač; Ostalo
sl-SI: Sistem vezi za tek na smučeh: NNN; Pilot; Prolink; Rottefella Roller; SNS; Turnamic; Univerzalni nastavek; Drugo
zh-TW: 越野滑雪固定器系統: NNN; Pilot; Prolink; Rottefella Roller; SNS; Turnamic; 通用底座; 其他
ko: 국가 간 바인딩 시스템: NNN; 파일럿; 프로링크; 로테펠라 롤러; SNS; 투르나믹; 유니버설 마운트; 기타
sv: Bindningssystem för längdskidåkning: NNN; Pilot; Prolink; Rottefella Roller; SNS; Turnamic; Universalfäste; Övrigt
it: sistema di legame a croce: NNN; Pilot; Prolink; Rottefella Roller; SNS; Turnamic; Attacco universale; Altro
vi: Hệ thống buộc giày trượt tuyết địa hình: NNN; Pilot; Prolink; Rottefella Roller; SNS; Turnamic; Ngàm gắn vạn năng; Khác
nl: Cross-country binding systeem: NNN; Pilot; Prolink; Rottefella Roller; SNS; Turnamic; Universele bevestiging; Overig
el: Σύστημα δεσίματος ανώμαλου δρόμου: NNN; Pilot; Prolink; Rottefella Roller; SNS; Turnamic; Βάση γενικής χρήσης; Άλλο
es: Sistema de fijación para esquí de fondo: NNN; Pilot; Prolink; Rottefella Roller; SNS; Turnamic; Soporte universal; Otro
da: Langrends-bindingssystem: NNN; Pilot; Prolink; Rottefella Roller; SNS; Turnamic; Universalbeslag; Andet
fr: Système de fixation de ski de fond: NNN; Pilot; Prolink; Rottefella Roller; SNS; Turnamic; Fixation universelle; Autre
sk-SK: Systém viazania na bežecké lyže: NNN; Pilot; Prolink; Rottefella Roller; SNS; Turnamic; Univerzálne upevnenie; Iné
nb: Kryssende bindingssystem: NNN; Pilot; Prolink; Rottefella Roller; SNS; Turnamic; Universalfeste; Annet
pt-BR: Sistema de fixação para esqui cross-country: NNN; Pilot; Prolink; Rottefella Roller; SNS; Turnamic; Montagem universal; Outro
bg-BG: Система за закрепване на ски за ски бягане: NNN; Pilot; Prolink; Rottefella Roller; SNS; Turnamic; Универсален монтаж; Други
fi: Maastohiihtosuksien sidejärjestelmä: NNN; Pilot; Prolink; Rottefella Roller; SNS; Turnamic; Yleiskiinnitys; Muu